Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning herein given to each of them:

"City" means any city or town.

"Chief executive" means the mayor in a mayor-council or commission city and city manager in a council-manager city.

"Corporate authority" means the legislative body of any city.

"Project" means a pedestrian mall project.

"Right-of-way" means that area of land dedicated for public use or secured by the public for purposes of ingress and egress to abutting property and other public purposes.

"Mall" means an area of land, part of which may be surfaced, landscaped, and used entirely for pedestrian movements, except with respect to governmental functions, utilities, and loading and unloading of goods.

"Mall organization" means a group of property owners, lessors, or lessees in an area that has been organized to consider the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a mall in a given area and persons owning or having any legal or equitable interest in the real property affected by the establishment of the mall.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.010. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 1.]